Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 3. Voting Equipment and Systems.
§ 24.2-638.
Voting equipment to be in plain view; officers and others not permitted to see actual voting; unlocking counter compartment of equipment, etc.

During the election, the exterior of the voting equipment and every part of the polling place shall be in plain view of the officers of election.

No voting or counting machines shall be removed from the plain view of the officers of election or from the polling place at any time during the election and through the determination of the vote as provided in §

24.2-657

, except as provided in subsection D of §

24.2-649.1

. In the case of an emergency that makes a polling place unusable or inaccessible, voting or counting machines may be removed to an alternative polling place pursuant to the provisions of subsection D of §

24.2-310

.

The equipment shall be placed at least four feet from any table where an officer of election is working or seated. The officers of election shall not themselves be, or permit any other person to be, in any position or near any position that will permit them to observe how a voter votes or has voted.

One of the officers shall inspect the face of the voting machine after each voter has cast his vote and verify that the ballots on the face of the machine are in their proper places and that the machine has not been damaged. During an election, the door or other covering of the counter compartment of the voting or counting machine shall not be unlocked or open or the counters exposed except for good and sufficient reasons, a statement of which shall be made and signed by the officers of election and attached to the statement of results. No person shall be permitted in or about the polling place except the voting equipment custodian, vendor, or contractor technicians and other persons authorized by this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-305; 1962, c. 260; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-215; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2004, cc. 978, 993, 1006, 1010; 2009, c. 494; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, cc. 18, 492; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 163.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 978 added the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and inserted “vendor or contractor technicians” in the second paragraph.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1006 added the second paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 494, in the first paragraph, inserted “the names of the voters who used the machine while it was removed provided that secrecy of the ballot is maintained in accordance with guidance from the State Board” in the third sentence and inserted the present fourth and fifth sentences.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are nearly identical, and deleted “and counting” following “voting” in the first paragraph; in the second paragraph substituted a variation of “machine” for “device” and “equipment” throughout the paragraph; and in the last paragraph substituted “machine” for “device” throughout the paragraph, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted “or general registrar” in the fifth sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 163, effective July 1, 2021, transferred much of the second paragraph to subsection D of §

24.2-649.1

and substituted “except as provided in subsection D of §

24.2-649.1

” in its place.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

§ 24.2-639.
Duties of officers of election.

The officers of election of each precinct at which voting systems are used shall meet at the polling place by 5:15 a.m. on the day of the election and arrange the equipment, furniture, and other materials for the conduct of the election. The officers of election shall verify that all required equipment, ballots, and other materials have been delivered to them for the election. The officers shall post at least two instruction cards for direct recording electronic machines conspicuously within the polling place.

The keys to the equipment and any electronic activation devices that are required for the operation of electronic voting equipment shall be delivered, prior to the opening of the polls, to the officer of election designated by the electoral board or general registrar in a sealed envelope on which has been written or printed the name of the precinct for which it is intended. The envelope containing the keys and any electronic activation devices shall not be opened until all of the officers of election for the precinct are present at the polling place and have examined the envelope to see that it has not been opened. The equipment shall remain locked against voting until the polls are formally opened and shall not be operated except by voters in voting.

Before opening the polls, each officer shall examine the equipment and see that no vote has been cast and that the counters register zero. The officers shall conduct their examination in the presence of the following party and candidate representatives: one authorized representative of each political party or independent candidate in a general or special election, or one authorized representative of each candidate in a primary election, if such representatives are available. Each authorized representative shall be a qualified voter of any jurisdiction of the Commonwealth. Each representative, who is not himself a candidate or party chairman, shall present to the officers of election a written statement designating him to be a representative of the party or candidate and signed by the county or city chairman of his political party, the independent candidate, or the primary candidate, as appropriate. If the county or city chairman is unavailable to sign such a written designation, such a designation may be made by the state or district chairman of the political party. However, no written designation made by a state or district chairman shall take precedence over a written designation made by the county or city chairman. Such statement, bearing the chairman’s or candidate’s original signature, may be photocopied and such photocopy shall be as valid as if the copy had been signed.

If any counter, other than a protective or private counter, on a ballot scanner is found not to register zero, the officers of election shall immediately notify the general registrar, who shall, if possible, substitute a machine in good working order, that has been prepared and tested pursuant to §

24.2-634

. No ballot scanner shall be used if any counter, other than a protective or private counter, is found not to register zero.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-306; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-216; 1972, c. 620; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 1998, c. 264; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 993, 1010; 2010, c. 448; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2015, c. 133; 2016, cc. 18, 464, 492.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, split the former third paragraph into the present third and fourth paragraphs, and substituted “one authorized representative of each political party or independent candidate in a general or special election, or one authorized representative of each candidate in a primary election, if such representatives are available. Each authorized representative shall be a qualified voter of the county or city within which the polling place is located. Each representative, who is not himself a candidate or party chairman, shall present to the officers of election a written statement designating him to be a representative of the party or candidate and signed by the county or city chairman of his political party, the independent candidate, or the primary candidate, as appropriate. Such statement, bearing the chairman’s or candidate’s original signature, may be photocopied and such photocopy shall be as valid as if the copy had been signed” for “(i) in a general election, a representative of each political party, or (ii) in a primary election, a representative of each party holding a primary, or (iii) in a city or town council election in which no candidate is a party nominee and which is held when no other election having party nominees is being conducted, a representative of each candidate, if such representatives are available” at the end of the present third paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 993 and 1010 are identical, and in the second paragraph, inserted “and any activation devices that are required for the operation of electronic voting equipment” and substituted “name of the precinct for which it is intended” for “number of each device, the number of the seal, if any, and the number registered on the protective counter, if one” and inserted “and any electronic activation devices”; and rewrote the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 448 substituted “any jurisdiction of the Commonwealth” for “the county or city within which the polling place is located” in the third paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical and, in the first paragraph, substituted “machines” for “equipment” and “voting devices,” “are” for “is,” deleted “mechanical or” following “instruction cards for,” and inserted “recording”; deleted the first and second sentences in the last paragraph, which read “If any counter, other than a protective or private counter, on mechanical voting equipment is found not to register zero, the officers shall make a written statement identifying the counter, together with the number registered on it, and shall sign and post the statement on the wall of the polling room, where it shall remain during the day of election. The officers shall enter a similar statement on the statement of results. In determining the results, they shall subtract such number from the final total registered on that counter,” substituted “ballot scanner” for “mark sense” twice and “machine” for “voting device” and “device.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 133 added the fifth and sixth sentences in the third paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted “or general registrar” in the second paragraph and substituted “general registrar, who” for “electoral board which” in the last paragraph.

The 2016 amendment by c. 464, effective July 1, 2020, in the first paragraph, substituted “systems” for “or counting machines”; and, in the last paragraph, deleted “or direct recording electronic machine” following “ballot scanner” in the first and second sentences.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-640.
Repealed by Acts 2014, c. 540, cl. 2, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, cl. 2, effective April 4, 2014.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-640

, pertaining to ballots generally, derived from Code 1950, § 24-297; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-207; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 1998, c. 797; 2000, c. 514; 2002, c. 738; 2010, c. 204.

§ 24.2-641.
Sample ballot.

The electoral board or general registrar shall provide for each precinct in which any voting or counting machines are used two sample ballots for each ballot style in use at that precinct. Such sample ballots shall be posted for public inspection at each polling place during the day of election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-298; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-208; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, cc. 18, 492; 2018, c. 464.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and substituted “any” for “mechanical voting machines or direct electronic,” “or counting machines” for “devices,” “machine” for “device,” and inserted “or counting” following “front of the voting.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted “or general registrar” and deleted a comma following “machines are used.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 464 substituted “for each ballot style in use at that precinct” for “which shall be arranged as a diagram of the front of the voting or counting machine as it will appear with the official ballot for voting on election day” in the first sentence.

§ 24.2-642.
Inoperative equipment.

When any voting or counting machine becomes inoperative in whole or in part while the polls are open, the officers of election shall immediately notify the electoral board or general registrar. If possible, the electoral board or general registrar shall dispatch a qualified technician to the polling place to repair the inoperative machine. All repairs shall be made in the presence of two officers of election representing the two political parties or, in the case of a primary election for only one party, two officers representing that party. If the machine cannot be repaired on site, the general registrar shall, if possible, substitute a machine in good order for the inoperative machine and at the close of the polls the record of both machines shall be taken and the votes shown on their counters shall be added together in ascertaining the results of the election.No voting or counting machines, including inoperative machines, shall be removed from the plain view of the officers of election or from the polling place at any time during the election and through the determination of the vote as provided in §

24.2-657

except as explicitly provided pursuant to the provisions of this title.No voting or counting machine that has become inoperative and contains votes may be removed from the polling place while the polls are open and votes are being ascertained. If the officers of election are unable to ascertain the results from the inoperative machine after the polls close in order to add its results to the results from the other machines in that precinct, the officers of election shall lock and seal the machine without removing the memory card, cartridge, or data storage medium and deliver the machine to either the clerk of court or registrar’s office as provided for in §

24.2-659

. On the day following the election, the electoral board shall meet and ascertain the results from the inoperative machine in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the machine’s manufacturer and add the results to the results for the precinct to which the machine was assigned.Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the removal of an inoperative machine from a precinct prior to the opening of the polls or the first vote being cast on that machine. Any machine so removed shall be placed in the custody of an authorized custodian, technician, general registrar, or electoral board representative. If the inoperative machine can be repaired, it shall be retested and resealed pursuant to §

24.2-634

and may be returned to the precinct by an authorized custodian, technician, general registrar, or electoral board representative. The officers of election shall then open the machine pursuant to §

24.2-639

.

In any precinct that uses a ballot that can be read without the use of the ballot scanner machine, if the ballot scanner machine becomes inoperative and there is no other available scanner, the uncounted ballots shall be placed in a ballot container or compartment that is used exclusively for uncounted ballots. If an operative scanner is available in the polling place after the polls have closed, such uncounted ballots shall be removed from the container and fed into the scanner, one at a time, by an officer of election in the presence of all persons who may be lawfully present at that time but before the votes are determined pursuant to §

24.2-657

. If such a scanner is not available, the ballots may be counted manually or as directed by the electoral board.

An officer of election may have copies of the official paper ballot reprinted or reproduced by photographic, electronic, or mechanical processes for use at the election if (i) the inoperative machine cannot be repaired in time to continue using it at the election, (ii) a substitute machine is needed to conduct the election but is not available for use, (iii) the supply of official printed ballots that can be cast without use of the inoperative machine is not adequate, and (iv) the local electoral board approves the reprinting or reproducing of the official paper ballot. The voted ballot copies may be received by the officers of election and placed in the ballot container and counted with the votes registered on the voting or counting machines, and the result shall be declared the same as though no machine has been inoperative. The voted ballot copies shall be deemed official ballots for the purpose of §

24.2-665

and preserved and returned with the statement of results and with a certificate setting forth how and why the same were voted. The officer of election who had the ballot copies made shall provide a written statement of the number of copies made, signed by him and subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, to be preserved with the unused ballot copies.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-311; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-221; 1981, c. 570; 1985, c. 458; 1993, c. 641; 2000, c. 282; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 978, 993, 1006, 1010; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

Cross references.

As to permitted use of paper ballots, §

24.2-646.1

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 282 designated the former first paragraph as subsection A, added present subsection B, and designated the former second paragraph as subsection C and inserted “or other official ballots that can be cast without the use of the inoperative device” in clause C (iii).

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, twice substituted “container” for “box.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 978 and 1006 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection A and substituted “that” for “which” in subsection B.

The 2004 amendment by c. 993 rewrote subsection A and substituted “that” for “which” in subsection B.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1010, in the first paragraph of subsection A, inserted “dispatch a qualified technician to the polling place to repair the inoperative device” and “If the device cannot be repaired on site, the electoral board shall, if possible” and added the third sentence and the second and third paragraphs.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and substituted a variation of “machine” for “device” throughout the section; in the second paragraph of subsection A substituted “machines” for “equipment” twice; in the last paragraph of subsection A substituted “the first vote” for “votes” and made minor stylistic changes; in subsection B substituted “read” for “marked” and “ballot scanner machine” or “scanner” for a variation of “counting device” throughout the subsection; and in subsection C substituted “An officer of election may have copies of the official paper ballot reprinted or reproduced by photographic, electronic, or mechanical processes for use at the election if” for “If,” “printed” for “paper ballots, or other official,” “the reprinting or reproducing” for “an officer of election may have copies,” and deleted “reprinted or reproduced by photographic, electronic, or mechanical processes for use at the election” following “official paper ballot.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “or general registrar” following “electoral board” in the first and second sentences and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” in the fourth sentence of the first paragraph and twice inserted “general registrar” in the fourth paragraph.